Arkansas, session 2025, HB1630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-10-101(a)(1), concerning predicate
felonies for capital murder, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Acting alone or with one (1) or more other persons:
(A) The person commits or attempts to commit:
(i) Terrorism, as defined in § 5-54-205;
(ii) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(iii) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(iv) Vehicular piracy, § 5-11-105;
(v) Robbery, § 5-12-102;
(vi) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(vii) Residential burglary, § 5-39-201(a);
(viii) Commercial burglary, § 5-39-201(b);
*CEB175*
03-19-2025 14:33:54 CEB175

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1630
(ix) Aggravated residential burglary, § 5-39-204;
(x) A felony violation of the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act, §§ 5-64-101 — 5-64-508, involving an actual delivery of a
controlled substance; or
(xi) First degree escape, § 5-54-110; and
(B) In the course of and in furtherance of the felony
offense or in immediate flight from the felony offense, the person or an
accomplice causes the death of a person under circumstances manifesting
extreme indifference to the value of human life;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-10-102(a)(1), concerning predicate felonies for
murder in the first degree, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Acting alone or with one (1) or more other persons:
(A) The person commits or attempts to commit a felony or a
violation of the Uniform Controlled Substance Act, §§ 5-64-101 — 5-64-508,
involving an actual delivery of a controlled substance; and
(B) In the course of and in the furtherance of the felony
offense or in immediate flight from the felony offense, the person or an
accomplice causes the death of any person under circumstances manifesting
extreme indifference to the value of human life;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-10-104(a)(4), concerning the predicate
felonies for manslaughter, is amended to read as follows:
(4) Acting alone or with one (1) or more persons:
(A) The person commits or attempts to commit a felony or a
violation of the Uniform Controlled Substance Act, §§ 5-64-101 — 5-64-508,
involving an actual delivery of a controlled substance; and
(B) In the course of and in furtherance of the felony
offense or in immediate flight from the felony:
(i) The person or an accomplice negligently causes
the death of any person; or
(ii) Another person who is resisting the felony
offense or flight causes the death of any person.

/s/Gazaway

03-19-2025 14:33:54 CEB175